Louisiana, session 2026, HB367.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 3:3372(E)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3372. Enforcement
* * *
E. Civil penalties may be assessed, probation may be imposed, and permits,
licenses, and registrations may be suspended or revoked only by a ruling of the
commission based on an adjudicatory hearing held in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act and the following special provisions:
* * *
(2) The commission shall notify the alleged violator by certified mail at least
thirty days prior to the date the hearing is held in accordance with the provisions of
the Administrative Procedure Act.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.